Utah statutes.
58-83-306.   Drugs approved for online prescribing, dispensing, and facilitation.

(1)  An online prescriber may only prescribe, an online contract pharmacy may only dispense, and an Internet facilitator may only facilitate the prescribing and dispensing of, non-controlled, legend drugs that have been:

(a)  approved by the Food and Drug Administration;

(b)  prescribed to treat the condition for which the drug was approved; and

(c)  specifically approved by the division for online prescribing by administrative rule adopted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  If, after January 1, 2010, the Food and Drug Administration issues a clinical black box warning with respect to any drug approved by the board under Subsection (1), the division shall determine what action, if any, is necessary to protect the public health or welfare as a result of the black box warning.

